Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5016.07
Witness; demand for fees; effect.

At the commencement of each day, after the first day, a witness may demand his or her fees for that day's attendance in obedience to a subpoena, and if the same is not paid he or she shall not be required to remain.

Laws 2004, LB 973, § 58.